Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.120

Impounding—Procedure.

Upon taking possession of any livestock at large contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or any unclaimed livestock submitted or impounded, by any person, at any public livestock market or any other facility approved by the director, the sheriff or brand inspector shall cause it to be transported to and impounded at the nearest public livestock market licensed under chapter 16.65 RCW or at such place as approved by the director. If the sheriff has impounded an animal in accordance with this section, he or she shall forthwith notify the nearest brand inspector of the department of agriculture, who shall examine the animal and, by brand, tattoo, or other identifying characteristic, shall attempt to ascertain the ownership thereof.

[ 2012 c 25 s 5. Prior: 2011 c 336 s 419; 2011 c 103 s 11; 1989 c 286 s 12; 1979 c 154 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 15; 1951 c 31 s 3. Formerly RCW 16.13.030.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.